Colorado, session 2026A, HB1356.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal part 7 of article
11 of title 22.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-2-2102, amend (2)
introductory portion and (2)(d)(II); and repeal (2)(d)(III) as follows:
2-2-2102. Accountability, accreditation, student performance,
and resource inequity task force - appointments - meetings.
(2) The task force members must be appointed on or before July 1,
2023. Following the appointment of the task force members pursuant to this
subsection (2), the speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint the
chairperson, and the president of the senate shall appoint the
vice-chairperson. The task force consists of twenty-six TWENTY-FIVE
members, and task force members are appointed as follows:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(d) The senate minority leader shall appoint the following members:
(II) One teacher who teaches in a rural school district; AND
(III) One superintendent who represents a rural school district that
participates in the local accountability system grant program established in
section 22-11-703 and who has experience as a school district
superintendent in Colorado public schools; and
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-2-2103, repeal
(1)(b)(II) and (1)(b)(III) as follows:
2-2-2103. Accountability, accreditation, student performance,
and resource inequity task force - duties - report.
(1) (b) To support the considerations of the task force set forth in
subsection (1)(a) of this section, the task force may review:
(II) The local accountability systems described in part 7 of article 11
of title 22;
(III) The results of the local accountability system grant program
created in section 22-11-703;
SECTION 4. Effective date. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1356

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1356